Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.290

Restitution—Disposition when victim dead or not found.

If a defendant has paid restitution pursuant to court order under RCW 9.92.060, 9.94A.750, 9.94A.753, 9.95.210, or 9A.20.030 and the victim entitled to restitution cannot be found or has died, the clerk of the court shall deposit with the county treasurer the amount of restitution unable to be paid to the victim. The county treasurer shall monthly transmit the money to the state treasurer for deposit as provided in RCW 43.08.250. Moneys deposited under this section shall be used to compensate victims of crimes through the crime victims' compensation fund.

[ 1997 c 358 s 3; 1987 c 281 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1987 c 281: See note following RCW 7.68.020.